Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-10,106
Service of process.

Legal process shall be served upon a society in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 35;

Laws 1987, LB 93, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 8.